src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-k4_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    tanki+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: tanki
    tanki+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: tanka
    tanki+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: tanka
    tanki+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: tanka
    tanki+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: tankar
    tanki+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: tankar
    tanki+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: tonkum
    tanki+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: tanka
    tanki+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: tankin
    tanki+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: tankan
    tanki+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: tankanum
    tanki+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: tankans
    tanki+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: tankarnir
    tanki+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: tankarnar
    tanki+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: tonkunum
    tanki+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: tankanna
